Washington statutes.
RCW 23.86.135

Members right to dissent—Exception for members of a rural electric association.

(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, a member of an association shall have the right to dissent from any of the following association actions:

(a) Any plan of merger or consolidation to which the association is a party;

(b) Any plan of conversion of the association to an ordinary business corporation; or

(c) Any sale or exchange of all or substantially all of the property and assets of the association not made in the usual and regular course of its business, including a sale in dissolution, but not including a sale pursuant to an order of a court having jurisdiction in the premises or a sale for cash on terms requiring that all or substantially all of the net proceeds of the sale be distributed to the members in accordance with their respective interests within one year from the date of sale.

(2) A member of a rural electric association is not entitled to dissent from a merger to which the association is a party if all members of the association have the right to continue their membership status in the surviving association on substantially similar terms.

[ 2016 c 228 s 1; 1989 c 307 s 30.]

NOTES:

Legislative finding—1989 c 307: See note following RCW 23.86.007.